src/verb.lexc
LEXICON 44
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	19;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Desr:+sA	22;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	15;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	11;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	26;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Opt:+yA	31;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	30;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	29;
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
+Prog2:+mAktA	24;
^DB+Adj+Agt:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Adj+Agt^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3pl:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AfterDoingSo:+yHp	#;
^DB+Adverb+AsLongAs:+dHkCA	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Adverb+SinceDoingSo:+yAlH	#;
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAdAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAksHzHn	#;
^DB+Noun+ActOf+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAcA	#;
^DB+Noun+ActOf+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mAcA	#;
^DB+Noun+ActOf+A3sg:+mAcA	#;
^DB+Noun+ActOf:+mAcA	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+A3sg+Pnon:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+A3sg:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+Prop+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState+A3sg+Pnon:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Verb+Able:+yAbil	40;
^DB+Verb+Hastily+Imp:+yHver	43;
^DB+Verb+Hastily:+yHver	42;

LEXICON 43
+A3pl:+sHnlAr	#;

LEXICON 42
+Aor:+Hr	41;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;

LEXICON 41
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 40
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	37;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Desr:+sA	38;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	39;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	34;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 39
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 38
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 37
+A1pl:+Hz	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	35;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	36;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 36
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 35
+Cond:+ysA	#;

LEXICON 34
+A3pl:+lAr	32;
+Cond:+ysA	33;

LEXICON 33
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 32
+Narr:+mHS	#;

LEXICON 31
+A1pl:+lHm	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;

LEXICON 30
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;
+A2sg:+n	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 29
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A2sg:+sHn	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Cond:+ysA	28;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	27;

LEXICON 28
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 27
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 26
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past:+ydH	25;

LEXICON 25
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 24
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Cop:+dHr	23;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 23
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 22
+A3pl:+lAr	21;
+Past:+ydH	20;

LEXICON 21
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 20
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 19
+A1pl:+Hz	#;
+A1sg:+Hm	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	18;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	17;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	16;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 18
+Cond:+ysA	#;

LEXICON 17
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 16
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 15
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A2sg:+sHn	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	13;
+Cond:+ysA	14;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past:+ydH	12;

LEXICON 14
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 13
+Cop:+dHr	#;
+Narr:+mHS	#;
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 12
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 11
+A1pl:+Hz	#;
+A1sg:+Hm	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	10;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	9;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 10
+Cop:+dHr	#;
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 9
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 8
+A2pl:+yHn	#;
+A3pl:+sHnlAr	#;
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 7
+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+mA	#;
+Neg+Imp:+mA	6;
+Neg:+mA	3;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Aor:+yAmA	4;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg:+yAmA	5;

LEXICON 6
+A2pl:+yHn	#;

LEXICON 5
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;

LEXICON 4
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 3
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;

LEXICON 2
+A2pl:+yHn	#;
+A2pl:+yHnHz	#;
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 1
+A2pl:+yHn	#;
+A3pl:+sHnlAr	#;
+A3sg:+sHn	#;
